DictionaryAnalyser/toy_example/apertium-es-ca/.deps/pgen-ca_valencia.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet/>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="test"/>
  </sdefs>

  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="caracter_general">
      <e>
        <i>;</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>#</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>)</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>:</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>(</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>[</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>]</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>"</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>'</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>*</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>@</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>«</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>-</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>,</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>?</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>/</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>`</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>±</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>­</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>$</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>)</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>:</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>.</i>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e>
        <i>1</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>2</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>3</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>4</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>5</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>6</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>7</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>8</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>9</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>0</i>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="numeros_menys_1">
      <e>
        <i>2</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>3</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>4</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>5</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>6</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>7</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>8</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>9</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>0</i>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="consonants_reduit">
      <e>
        <i>b</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>ç</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>f</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>g</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>j</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>k</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>m</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>n</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>p</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>q</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>r</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>t</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>v</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>w</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>x</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>y</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>z</i>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="consonant_menys_d">
      <e>
        <par n="caracter_general"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="numeros"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="consonants_reduit"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>c</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>l</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>s</i>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="consonant">
      <e>
        <par n="consonant_menys_d"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>d</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>ia</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>ie</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>io</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>iu</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>hia</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>hie</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>hio</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>hiu</i>
      </e> 
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="vocals">
      <e>
        <i>a</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>e</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>i</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>o</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>u</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>é</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>í</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>ó</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>ú</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>à</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>á</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>è</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>ò</i>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="vocal_general">
      <e>
        <par n="vocals"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>h</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>@</i>
	<par n="consonant"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>@</i>
	<par n="vocals"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>1<b/></i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>11<b/></i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>1</i>
        <par n="caracter_general"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>11</i>
        <par n="caracter_general"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="no_apostrofa">
      <e>
        <par n="caracter_general"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="numeros"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="consonants_reduit"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="vocals"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>c</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>d</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>h</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>l</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>s</i>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="no_apostrofa_menys_d">
      <e>
        <par n="caracter_general"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="numeros"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="consonants_reduit"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="vocals"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>c</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>h</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>l</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>s</i>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="consonantic">
      <e>
        <par n="caracter_general"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="numeros"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="consonants_reduit"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>c</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>d</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>h</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>l</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>s</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>i</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>u</i>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="no_apostrofa_menys_ie">
      <e>
        <par n="caracter_general"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="numeros"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="consonants_reduit"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>c</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>d</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>h</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>l</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>s</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>a</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>o</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>u</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>ó</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>ú</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>à</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>á</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>ò</i>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="vocals_per_a_la">
      <e>
        <i>a</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>à</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>á</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>e</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>é</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>è</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>o</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>ó</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>ò</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>í</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>ha</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>he</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>ho</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>hà</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>há</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>hè</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>hò</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>hé</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>hí</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>hó</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>hú</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>ú</i>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="vocal_general_menys_ae">
      <e>
        <i>à</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>á</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>è</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>é</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>i</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>í</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>o</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>ò</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>ó</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>u</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>ú</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>h</i>
      </e>
    </pardef>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l><a/>els<b/>hi<b/>ha</l>
          <r>n'hi<b/>ha</r>
        </p>
        <par n="caracter_general"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><a/>les<b/>hi<b/>ha</l>
          <r>n'hi<b/>ha</r>
        </p>
        <par n="caracter_general"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><a/>ex<b/></l>
          <r>ex</r>
        </p>
        <par n="consonant"/>
      </e>
